Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 4
MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION

Sec.

§ 49-401. Registration fee in lieu of property tax.

The registration fee imposed for vehicles under the provisions of this chapter shall be in lieu of all taxes on vehicles, general or local, and vehicles properly registered and for which the required fee for any part of the previous year has been paid shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation.

§ 49-401A. Owner to secure registration from a county assessor or the department.

Every owner of a motor vehicle, trailer or semitrailer who intends to operate the vehicle upon any highway in this state shall before the same is so operated, apply to a county assessor and obtain registration for vehicles in sections 49-402(1) through (3), 49-402A, 49-402B and 49-422, Idaho Code. All others shall be obtained from the department except as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Owners of vehicles specified in section 49-426, Idaho Code, are exempt from the provisions of this section. Owners of vehicles operating on a temporary basis as provided in sections 49-431(3), 49-432 and 49-433, Idaho Code, are exempt from the provisions of this section to the extent that the temporary permits in use are unexpired.

Commercial vehicles in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds gross weight, farm and noncommercial vehicles in excess of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds gross weight and all vehicles registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code, shall be registered by the department. All other commercial, farm and noncommercial vehicles and the vehicles in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection, shall be registered by the county assessor.

Motor vehicles equipped primarily to haul passengers on a commercial basis, doing strictly an intrastate business, and having gross weights of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less.

Any farm vehicle or combination of vehicles where each vehicle or combination of vehicles shall not exceed a gross weight of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds.

Nonresident vehicles or combination of vehicles owned by transient labor used in hauling unprocessed agricultural products for hire and not exceeding sixty thousand (60,000) pounds gross weight shall register their vehicle for the appropriate gross weight scale for the annual fee if registered on or before June 30, and for one-half (½) the annual fee if not registered until on or after July 1 of any year, with the assessor of the county in which the owner resides.

Commercial, farm and noncommercial vehicles of any weight doing strictly an intrastate business may be registered by the county assessor by mutual agreement between the department and the county.

§ 49-401B. Application for registration — Receipt for fee — Record of applicants.

Application for the registration of a vehicle required to be registered under the provisions of section 49-401A, Idaho Code, shall be made to the assessor or the department as specified in that section, by the owner upon the appropriate form. Every application shall contain the owner’s Idaho driver’s license number, Idaho identification card number, social security number or individual taxpayer identification number. In the case of a business, the employer tax identification number is required. Every application shall also contain the owner’s true and full legal name. In the event that the owner does not possess a social security number, individual taxpayer identification number, Idaho driver’s license number, or Idaho identification card number, the owner shall present written documentation sufficient to the department to determine that no social security number has been issued. In the event that a business, trust or other statutorily created entity is not required to have and does not possess an employer tax identification number, the applicant shall provide a written statement certifying that the entity does not possess an employer tax identification number. Such application must be signed by the owner and contain his residence address and mailing address, if different, and a brief description of the vehicle to be registered, including the name of the maker, the type of fuel used, and the identification number. If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state in the application required pursuant to this section the applicant’s alternative Idaho mailing address in place of his or her residence address. Upon registration of a new vehicle, the application shall also show the date of sale by the manufacturer or dealer to the person first operating such vehicle. The application shall contain any other information as may be required by the department and shall contain a provision that allows an owner to choose to participate in the Idaho state parks passport program. The assessor shall issue to the applicant a receipt for any fee paid. Social security numbers collected shall not appear on certificates of registration, and all applications on file shall be exempt from disclosure, except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203 and 49-203A, Idaho Code.

The assessor shall record on a form prescribed and furnished by the department, the names of all owners of vehicles residing in the county who make application for registration, together with the amounts of the fees paid by such owners.

When application for registration is made by any motor carrier, the assessor or the department shall require each such applicant to execute a certification of safety compliance.

Vehicles registered under the proportional registration provisions of section 49-435, Idaho Code, shall be registered by the department.

Every owner of a vehicle registered by a county assessor shall give his physical domicile residence address or the business physical principal address to the assessor so that the proper county can be entered upon the registration. Failure to do so shall be unlawful. The department shall then attribute the registration, and all fees to be apportioned to the highway distribution account, to the county of residence regardless of the county in which the registration occurred. Fees imposed under the provisions of sections 40-827 and 40-1416, Idaho Code, shall be separately identified and accounted for, and paid to the highway district for which collected. Fees collected in addition to vehicle registration fees for the Idaho state parks passport program, as provided in section 49-402(11), Idaho Code, shall be separately identified and accounted for and paid to the state treasurer on a monthly basis to be deposited in the park and recreation fund as specified in section 49-402(11), Idaho Code. For the purposes of vehicle registration, a person is an actual and permanent resident of the county in which he has his principal residence or domicile. A principal residence or domicile shall not be a person’s workplace, vacation, or part-time residence.

A violation of the provisions of this section shall be an infraction.

§ 49-402. Annual registration.

The annual fee for operating each pickup truck, each neighborhood electric vehicle and each other motor vehicle having a maximum gross weight not in excess of eight thousand (8,000) pounds and that complies with the federal motor vehicle safety standards as defined in section 49-107, Idaho Code, shall be:

For all school buses operated either by a nonprofit, nonpublic school or operated pursuant to a service contract with a school district for transporting children to or from school or in connection with school-approved activities, the annual fee shall be twenty-four dollars ($24.00) and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.

For all motorcycles and motor-driven cycles that comply with the federal motor vehicle safety standards, operated upon the public highways, the annual fee shall be nineteen dollars ($19.00) and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.

For operation of an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or motorbike, excluding a motorbike with an engine displacement of fifty (50) cubic centimeters or less, on city, county or highway district roads or highways open to such use, a restricted vehicle license plate fee pursuant to section 49-450, Idaho Code, shall be paid. In addition, the registration fee specified in section 67-7122, Idaho Code, shall be paid as provided in section 67-7122, Idaho Code. The registration and restricted vehicle license plate exemption provided in section 49-426(2), Idaho Code, applies to all-terrain vehicles, utility type vehicles, motorbikes and motorcycles used for the purposes described in section 49-426(2), Idaho Code. Nonresidents shall be allowed to purchase a restricted vehicle license plate and sticker for an all-terrain vehicle, utility type vehicle or motorbike.
(5) For all motor homes, the fee shall be as specified in subsection (1) of this section and shall be in addition to the fees provided for in section 49-445, Idaho Code.

Vehicles one (1) and two (2) years old ............................... $69.00

Vehicles three (3) and four (4) years old ............................... $57.00

Vehicles five (5) and six (6) years old ............................... $57.00

Vehicles seven (7) and eight (8) years old ............................... $45.00

Vehicles over eight (8) years old ............................... $45.00

There shall be twelve (12) registration periods, starting in January for holders of validation registration stickers numbered 1, and proceeding consecutively through December for holders of validation registration stickers numbered 12, each of which shall start on the first day of a calendar month and end on the last day of the twelfth month from the first day of the beginning month. Registration periods shall expire midnight on the last day of the registration period in the year designated by the validation registration sticker. The numeral digit on the validation registration stickers shall, as does the registration card, fix the registration period under the staggered registration system for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.

A vehicle that has once been registered for any of the above-designated periods shall, upon reregistration, be registered for the period bearing the same number, and the registration card shall show and be the exclusive proof of the expiration date of registration and licensing. Vehicles may be initially registered for less than a twelve (12) month period, or for more than a twelve (12) month period, and the fee prorated on a monthly basis if the fractional registration tends to fulfill the purpose of the monthly series registration system.

(6) Registration fees shall not be subject to refund.

(7) A financial institution or repossession service contracted to a financial institution repossessing vehicles under the terms of a security agreement shall move the vehicle from the place of repossession to the financial institution’s place of business on a repossession plate. The repossession plate shall also be used for demonstrating the vehicle to a prospective purchaser for a period not to exceed ninety-six (96) hours. The registration fees for repossession plates shall be as required in subsection (1) of this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other fees required under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to the registration fee. The repossession plate shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.

(8) A wrecker or towing business engaged in the process of towing motorized vehicles, which have been wrecked, abandoned, salvaged or may be disabled, may apply for a wrecker plate to be displayed on those vehicles being towed, provided the power unit is properly registered under this chapter. The registration fees for wrecker plates shall be as required in subsection (1) of this section for a vehicle one (1) and two (2) years old. All other fees required under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, shall be in addition to the registration fee and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.

(9) In addition to the annual registration fee in this section, there shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and an annual program fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00) for all special license plate programs for those license plates issued pursuant to sections 49-404A, 49-407, 49-408, 49-409, 49-414, 49-416, 49-418 and 49-418D, Idaho Code. For special plates issued pursuant to sections 49-406 and 49-406A, Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) but there shall be no annual renewal fee. For special plates issued pursuant to sections 49-415D, 49-417, 49-417A, 49-417B, 49-417C, 49-417D, 49-418A, 49-418B, 49-418C, 49-419, 49-419A, 49-419C, 49-419E, 49-420, 49-420A, 49-420B, 49-420C, 49-420D, 49-420E, 49-420J, 49-420K, 49-420L, 49-420M, 49-420N, 49-420O, 49-420P, 49-420Q, and 49-420R, Idaho Code, and any new special plate program effective on and after January 1, 2013, pursuant to section 49-402D, Idaho Code, there shall be an initial program fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) and an annual program fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The fees contained in this subsection shall be applicable to all new special plate programs and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration. The initial program fee and the annual program fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of special license plate programs, unless otherwise specified by law.

(10) Any vehicle that does not meet federal motor vehicle safety standards shall not be registered and shall not be permitted to operate on public highways of the state, as defined in section 40-117, Idaho Code, unless otherwise specifically authorized.

§ 49-402A. Utility trailers — Registration, fees and transfers.

The department shall register a utility trailer for a period of one (1) year for a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

The department may register a utility trailer for a five (5) year period or for a ten (10) year period, and shall issue a license plate with the year of expiration designated by a validation sticker. Five (5) year registrations shall cost twenty dollars ($20.00) and ten (10) year registrations shall cost thirty dollars ($30.00) and shall be subject to staggered registration for the purpose of reregistration and notice of expiration.

If ownership or interest in the trailer transfers as a result of a sale, neither the registration card nor plate can be transferred to another person. The registration card and plate shall remain in the possession of the transferor and may be transferred to another utility trailer owned by the transferor, and shall be valid until expiration of the original registration.

§ 49-402B. Optional biennial registration.

At the option of the applicant, any vehicle registered under the provisions of section 49-402(1) through (5), Idaho Code, may be registered for a period of two (2) years for a fee that is double the fee currently assessed for annual registration of the vehicle in section 49-402, Idaho Code.

If any vehicle registered under a special license plate program is registered for a two (2) year period as provided in this section, the registrant shall also be required to pay the special programs fees for a two (2) year period.

The additional fee collected for emergency medical services pursuant to section 49-452, Idaho Code, or project choice pursuant to section 49-454, Idaho Code, shall also be doubled for any registration issued under the provisions of this section.

The administrative fee collected for issuance of a motor vehicle registration shall be the same as for an annual registration and shall not be doubled or in any way increased solely because of registration under the provisions of this section.

§ 49-402C. Special license plate programs — Standardized plate color and design.

It is the intent of the legislature that special license plates issued by the department be readily recognizable as plates from the state of Idaho without losing the uniqueness for which the special plate was designed and purchased. In addition, the legislature finds that the department can operate in a more efficient, cost-effective manner by conforming special plates to a basic color and design.

No special license plates and no special license plate programs in existence on or before June 30, 1998, shall be affected by the provisions of subsections (2) through (5) of this section. On and after July 1, 1998, any new special license plate program authorized or any redesign of an existing special license plate shall use the same red, white and blue background as the standard issue of license plates described in section 49-443, Idaho Code, except that:

The identification of county shall be omitted;

The word “Idaho” shall appear on every plate;

The inscription “Scenic Idaho” may be omitted without legislative consideration and approval; and

No slogan shall be used that infringes upon, dilutes or compromises, or could be perceived to infringe upon, dilute or compromise, the trademarks of the state of Idaho, including, but not limited to, “Idaho Potatoes®,” “Grown in Idaho/tm,” “Famous Idaho Potatoes/tm” or “Famous Potatoes®.”

Any redesign required for a special plate to conform with legislative intent and the provisions of this section may be done in a manner similar to that used to produce the original design.

The special plates shall conform in all other respects with the provisions of section 49-443, Idaho Code, relating to visibility requirements, display of registration number, time period for validity of plates, and reservation of plate numbers.

Unless otherwise specifically provided, no special license plates shall be issued to motor vehicles with a registered maximum gross weight in excess of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, or any motor vehicle registered under section 49-434(5), Idaho Code, or section 49-435, Idaho Code.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, on and after July 1, 2020, no new special license plate or special license plate program shall be established for the benefit of any entity that is not the state of Idaho or an agency of the state of Idaho. With respect to any special license plate program that is in existence on July 1, 2020, that has a nonprofit agency as a recipient of the proceeds from the sales of such plate, if fewer than one thousand (1,000) plates are issued in the first year of the special plate program’s existence, fewer than one thousand five hundred (1,500) plates are issued in the second year of the special plate program’s existence, or fewer than two thousand (2,000) plates in the third or any subsequent year of such special plate program’s existence, the department shall discontinue that special license plate program.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the plate designs issued pursuant to the provisions of section 49-417, Idaho Code.

§ 49-402D. Special license plate prequalification process.

For any new special license plate program approved by the legislature, the program sponsor shall, before issuance of any such special license plate, meet the prequalification process outlined in this section. The program sponsor for any special plate program shall:

Submit a financial plan for the use of the proceeds from the special license plate sales and certify that all such proceeds shall be deposited in the highway distribution account, except with respect to any new special plate that may be established for the benefit of an Idaho college or university pursuant to section 49-418A, Idaho Code, or a military license plate; and

Designate an individual who shall be deemed responsible by the agency for certifying compliance with the requirements of this section and working with the department.

If the request for a special license plate is approved by the department, the following requirements, in addition to those set out in subsection (1) of this section, shall be met by September 1 prior to the next legislative session and prior to the issuance of any special license plates approved by the legislature.

The applicant shall deposit estimated programming and administrative costs with the department to be utilized for programming costs of the specialty plate. Administrative costs in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) shall be nonrefundable.

In addition to the requirements provided for in section 49-402C, Idaho Code, the applicant requesting a special license plate program shall provide to the department an acceptable plate design.

The applicant shall transmit to the department a list of two hundred fifty (250) applicants, whose vehicles are currently registered in the state of Idaho, who intend to purchase the specialty plate when available, as evidenced by completing forms provided by the department.

The department shall submit the completed applications for special license plate programs that meet the requirements of this section to the chairmen of the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation and defense committee each year on behalf of the agency to be included for consideration in the next legislative session.

On an annual basis, by December 1 of each calendar year, the sponsor of a special license plate program shall prepare an annual report, which shall be made available on request and shall be forwarded to the department. Such report shall include an accounting of revenues and expenditures associated with the funds collected for the special license plate program. The department shall compile and forward such reports to the chairmen of the senate transportation committee and the house of representatives transportation and defense committee by January 15 of each year. Failure of the agency to provide such report by the due date shall result in the discontinuation of the special license plate program sales on January 1. The provisions of this section shall exclude special plates established for the highway distribution account, an Idaho college or university pursuant to section 49-418A, Idaho Code, and military license plate programs.
(5) Any decision by the department that the special license plate program application does not meet the provisions of this section may be appealed to the director of the department. Such notice of appeal shall be made in writing within twenty (20) days of the notice of denial. For all denied applications, the department shall, at the next legislative session, report to the senate and house of representatives transportation committees on such denied applications and the reason for the denials.

(d) The department is authorized and shall adopt and promulgate rules to carry out the provisions of this section.

§ 49-402E. Rental fleet registration.

As used in this section “rental fleet” means more than twenty-five (25) motor vehicles that are:

Owned by a rental company;

Offered for rental without a hired driver through a rental agreement; and

Designated by the registered owner of the motor vehicle as a rental fleet vehicle at the time of registration.

On and after the effective date of this act, an owner that registers a motor vehicle, weighing sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds or less, under the provisions of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, may obtain an alternative special registration card and rental car stickers for the license plates if the motor vehicle is owned by a rental company and maintained in the rental company’s rental fleet.
(2)(a) On and after the effective date of this act, an owner that registers a motor vehicle, weighing sixteen thousand (16,000) pounds or less, under the provisions of chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, may obtain an alternative special registration card and rental car stickers for the license plates if the motor vehicle is owned by a rental company and maintained in the rental company’s rental fleet.

Although annual registration shall be required for each fleet vehicle, the registration card and rental car stickers for the license plates issued under paragraph (a) of this subsection are valid for the life of the motor vehicle while the motor vehicle is maintained in the rental fleet.

An owner that receives the alternative special registration card and rental car stickers for the license plates issued under this section shall renew the annual registration. If registration is not renewed, the registration shall be canceled.

In addition to the registration fees collected under chapter 4, title 49, Idaho Code, the department shall also collect an additional two dollars ($2.00) for the initial registration for each vehicle registered under this section, which shall be deposited in the state highway account.

§ 49-403. Disabled veteran — License plates.

No fee shall be charged for the registration or reregistration of a motor vehicle owned by a veteran who has established his rights to benefits under the provisions of Public Law 662, 79th Congress, as amended, and Public Law 187, 82nd Congress, as amended. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, nor to any vehicle registered under section 49-434(5), Idaho Code. No fee shall be charged for the registration or reregistration of a motor vehicle owned by a veteran, who is at the time of the registration or reregistration receiving compensation from the veterans administration or in lieu thereof, from any of the armed forces of the United States, for one hundred percent (100%) service-connected disability or for any of the following specific disabilities: Loss or permanent loss of use of one (1) or both feet; loss or permanent loss of use of one (1) or both hands; loss of sight in both eyes or permanent impairment of vision in both eyes to the degree as to constitute virtual blindness. These provisions shall be considered applicable not only as to the vehicle originally purchased under this authorization, but also as to any vehicle subsequently purchased and owned by the same veteran, so long as the privilege shall not extend to more than one (1) vehicle at a time. Special license plates shall be issued for such a vehicle, identified by the inscription “D.V.”, and a separate number series shall be used to further identify the license plates so issued. These license plates shall not be issued by the counties but shall be issued by the department. The plates shall be displayed in accordance with the procedure applicable to license plates set forth in section 49-428, Idaho Code. A vehicle displaying plates issued in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be afforded the same privileges specified in section 49-410(7), Idaho Code.

§ 49-403A. Purple heart recipient — License plates.

Purple heart recipient license plates are available to any applicant who is a veteran or an active or retired member of any of the armed forces of the United States, reserve forces or Idaho national guard and who furnishes proof of entitlement by providing one (1) of the following documents:

A copy of form DD214 or equivalent document showing an award of the purple heart medal;

A copy of the certificate presented with the medal; or

A copy of the military order describing the award of the medal to the applicant.

In addition to the regular registration fee, the applicant shall be charged the plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code. Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the registration shall expire, but the purple heart recipient may transfer his plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. He may display the plates only after receipt of new registration from the department. A purple heart recipient shall not register more than two (2) vehicles under the provisions of this section. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, nor to any vehicle registered under section 49-434(5), Idaho Code.

Purple heart recipient license plates may be retained and displayed on vehicles owned by the surviving spouse of a deceased purple heart recipient. In addition, the surviving spouse of a deceased purple heart recipient is eligible to reapply for and shall be issued purple heart recipient license plates if the deceased purple heart recipient died on or after January 1 of the five (5) years preceding the date of reapplication for the plates. Such plates shall be used on a vehicle owned by the surviving spouse.

The purple heart recipient license plates shall be of a color and design acceptable to the military order of the purple heart association and approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department.

Effective January 1, 2015, for those purple heart recipients who are listed as an owner of the vehicle who also qualify as disabled pursuant to section 49-410, Idaho Code, the international accessible symbol will also appear on the purple heart license plates. Such requirements must be met upon application for the license plates. Those plates with the disability symbol shall be nontransferable to a surviving spouse, unless the requirements of section 49-410, Idaho Code, can be met by the spouse.

A purple heart recipient who qualifies for a disabled veteran fee exemption under section 49-403, Idaho Code, shall have a choice between a purple heart recipient license plate or a disabled veteran license plate and shall not be charged a plate fee or a fee for registration or reregistration of the motor vehicle. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to the vehicle originally purchased under this authorization and also to any vehicle subsequently purchased and owned by the same veteran. The privilege shall not extend to more than one (1) vehicle owned by the veteran at a time.

§ 49-403B. Gold star — License plates.

In this section:

“Combat zone” means those locations involving a “period of war” as defined in 38 U.S.C. section 101(11) and such other locations and times as the division of veterans services may define by rule.

“Qualifying cause of death” means a death of a person due to hostile action while serving in the armed forces of the United States on active duty in a combat zone as the division of veterans services may define by rule.

“Qualifying family member” means the surviving spouse, parent, stepparent, child, stepchild, sibling, half-sibling, stepsibling, grandparent or legal guardian of a person who died due to a qualifying cause of death.

Qualifying family members are eligible to apply for gold star license plates. As proof of eligibility, the applicant shall furnish to the department a statement from the division of veterans services certifying eligibility.

The division of veterans services shall establish by rule the requirements for receipt of a certificate of eligibility including proof of qualifying familial relationship to the deceased service member and the death of the service member due to a qualifying cause of death.

No special plate program fee shall be charged in addition to regular registration or renewal of registration of a motor vehicle owned by the spouse, parent or stepparent of a service member who was killed during active military service in a combat zone and receiving gold star license plates.

A qualifying family member who is not the spouse, parent or stepparent shall be charged the regular registration fee and plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code, and an additional fee of thirty-five dollars ($35.00) for the initial issuance of plates and twenty-five dollars ($25.00) upon each succeeding annual registration. Ten dollars ($10.00) of the initial fee and ten dollars ($10.00) of the renewal fee shall be deposited in the state highway account and shall be used to fund the cost of administration of this gold star license plate program. Twenty-five dollars ($25.00) of each initial fee and fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each renewal fee shall be deposited in the veterans support fund, section 65-209, Idaho Code, and shall be used to defray the costs of administration of the eligibility certification program and to provide programs to support veterans.

Gold star license plates shall be used only on a motor vehicle owned by the qualifying family member.

Whenever title or interest in a motor vehicle registered under this section is transferred or assigned, the registration shall expire, but the qualifying family member may transfer the gold star license plates to another motor vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. The qualifying family member may only display the gold star license plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

A qualifying family member shall not register more than two (2) motor vehicles under this section. This section shall not apply to any motor vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds, nor to any vehicle registered under section 49-434(5), Idaho Code.

Gold star license plates may be retained and displayed on motor vehicles owned by the surviving spouse of a qualifying family member. In addition, the surviving spouse is eligible to reapply for and shall be issued gold star license plates if the deceased qualifying family member died on or after January 1 of the five (5) years preceding the date of reapplication for the gold star license plates. Such plates shall be used only on a motor vehicle owned by the surviving spouse of the qualifying family member.
(10) The gold star license plates shall be of a color and design acceptable to the veterans affairs commission and approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department. Gold star license plates shall not be subject to discontinuance pursuant to section 49-402C(6), Idaho Code.

§ 49-403C. Purple heart recipient motorcycle license plate.

On and after January 1, 2015, any person who is the owner of a motorcycle registered under the provisions of section 49-402, Idaho Code, may apply for and upon department approval receive a purple heart motorcycle license plate in lieu of a regular motorcycle license plate.

Purple heart recipient license plates are available to any applicant who is a veteran or an active or retired member of any of the armed forces of the United States, reserve forces or Idaho national guard, and who furnishes proof of entitlement by providing one (1) of the following documents:

A copy of form DD214 or equivalent document showing an award of the purple heart medal;

A copy of the certificate presented with the medal; or

A copy of the military order describing the award of the medal to the applicant.

In addition to the regular registration fee, the applicant shall be charged the plate fee required in section 49-450, Idaho Code. Whenever title or interest in a vehicle registered under the provisions of this section is transferred or assigned, the registration shall expire, but the purple heart recipient may transfer his plates to another vehicle upon payment of the required transfer fees. He may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department. A purple heart recipient shall not register more than two (2) vehicles under the provisions of this section.

Purple heart recipient license plates may be retained and displayed on vehicles owned by the surviving spouse of a deceased purple heart recipient. In addition, the surviving spouse of a deceased purple heart recipient is eligible to reapply for and shall be issued purple heart recipient motorcycle license plates if the deceased purple heart recipient died on or after January 1 of the five (5) years preceding the date of reapplication for the plates. Such plates shall be used on a motorcycle owned by the surviving spouse.

The purple heart recipient motorcycle license plates shall be of a color and design acceptable to the military order of the purple heart association and approved by the department, utilizing a numbering system as determined by the department.

For those purple heart recipients who are listed as an owner on a motorcycle who also qualify as disabled pursuant to section 49-410, Idaho Code, the international accessible symbol will also appear on the purple heart motorcycle license plates. Such requirements must be met upon application for the motorcycle license plates. Those plates with the disability symbol shall be nontransferable to a surviving spouse, unless the requirements of section 49-410, Idaho Code, can be met by the spouse.

§ 49-404. National guard members — Distinctive plates.

In order to enhance visibility and identification of national guard members during mobilizations and emergencies, any active member of the Idaho national guard residing in the state of Idaho may, upon application to the department, register not more than two (2) motor vehicles and receive for each vehicle distinctive national guard license plates in lieu of regular license plates. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any vehicle with a registered maximum gross weight over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds. The national guard license plates shall be designed, subject to the approval of the department, by the adjutant general. Proof of being an active member in the Idaho national guard must be furnished to the department before plates will be issued.

Whenever a member of the Idaho national guard transfers or assigns his title or interest to a vehicle especially registered under the provisions of this section, the registration shall expire but the member may hold his national guard license plates which he may have reissued to him upon the payment of the required transfer fees. He may only display the plates after receipt of new registration from the department.

In addition to the regular registration fees required in section 49-402(1) or 49-434(1), Idaho Code, the national guard member shall pay the plate fee specified in section 49-450, Idaho Code.

The Idaho national guard shall, prior to an individual’s discharge from active duty in the national guard, require that the national guard license plates either be turned in to the department or exchanged for other proper license plates as a condition of discharge.